Alabama, session 2026rs, SB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
Trey's Law.
Section 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of
the following:
(1) Sexual abuse causes significant and lasting harm to
individuals and society as a whole.
(2) Sexual abuse survivors often experience long-term
physical, psychological, and emotional trauma.
(3) The State of Alabama has a compelling interest in
preventing sexual abuse, supporting victims, and ensuring that
the law does not shield perpetrators or impede public safety.
(4) Any agreement that prohibits an individual or
entity from disclosing an act of sexual abuse or facts related
to an act of sexual abuse is against the public policy of this
state.
(5) This act is intended to protect survivors' rights
to speak freely and to maintain privacy and confidentiality
regarding their identities, experiences, and trauma.
Section 3. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
term "sexual abuse" means any conduct that would constitute a
Page 1

term "sexual abuse" means any conduct that would constitute a
SB30 Enrolled
criminal violation of Articles 4, 4A, 4B, 6, 6A, 8, or 11 of
Chapter 6 of Title 13A, Code of Alabama 1975, or any of the
offenses listed in Section 15-20A-5, Code of Alabama 1975,
regardless of whether the conduct has led to a criminal
charge, conviction, adjudication, or sentence.
(b)(1) Any provision of a nondisclosure agreement,
confidentiality agreement, employment agreement, settlement
agreement, or any other type of agreement that prohibits an
individual or entity from disclosing an act of sexual abuse or
facts related to an act of sexual abuse to another individual
or entity is void and unenforceable.
(2) This subsection shall apply to any agreement
entered into, executed, or amended on or after October 1,
2026, and shall apply solely to elements of an agreement
related to the act of sexual abuse and shall not apply to
other aspects of an agreement, including, but not limited to,
compensation.
Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB30 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB30
Senate 21-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 12-Feb-26




By: Senator Woods
Page 3